Washington statutes.
RCW 10.79.090

Strip, body cavity searches—Medical care not precluded.

Nothing in RCW 10.79.080 or this section may be construed as precluding or preventing the administration of medical care to persons requiring immediate medical care or requesting medical care.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 42 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1983 1st ex.s. c 42: See notes following RCW 10.79.060.